Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7870.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-1-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-1 entitled "Definitions and
General Code Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-1-9. Mobile equipment.
“Mobile equipment” means every vehicle not designed or used primarily for the
transportation of persons or property and only incidentally operated or moved over a highway,
including but not limited to: ditch digging apparatus, well boring apparatus, and road construction
or maintenance machinery such as asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, tractors
other than truck tractors, ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, road rollers,
scarifiers, earth moving carry-alls and scrapers, power shovels and drag lines, and self-propelled
cranes and earth moving equipment. The term does not include house trailers, dump trucks, truck
mounted transit mixers, cranes, or shovels, or other vehicles designed for the transportation of
persons or property to which machinery has been attached. For the purposes of this section
"incidentally" means actively participating in work in an active work zone, or crossing a highway
within a work zone. This does not include travelling down a highway under their own power.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005111
========